Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.050

Decision of the county annexation review board—Filing—Date for election.

After consideration of the proposed annexation as provided in RCW 35A.14.200, the county annexation review board, within thirty days after the final day of hearing, shall take one of the following actions:

(1) Approval of the proposal as submitted.

(2) Subject to RCW 35.02.170, modification of the proposal by adjusting boundaries to include or exclude territory; except that any such inclusion of territory shall not increase the total area of territory proposed for annexation by an amount exceeding the original proposal by more than five percent: PROVIDED, That the county annexation review board shall not adjust boundaries to include territory not included in the original proposal without first affording to residents and property owners of the area affected by such adjustment of boundaries an opportunity to be heard as to the proposal.

(3) Disapproval of the proposal.

The written decision of the county annexation review board shall be filed with the board of county commissioners and with the legislative body of the city concerned. If the annexation proposal is modified by the county annexation review board, such modification shall be fully set forth in the written decision. If the decision of the boundary review board or the county annexation review board is favorable to the annexation proposal, or the proposal as modified by the review board, the legislative body of the city at its next regular meeting if to be held within thirty days after receipt of the decision of the boundary review board or the county annexation review board, or at a special meeting to be held within that period, shall indicate to the county auditor its preference for a special election date for submission of such annexation proposal, with any modifications made by the review board, to the voters of the territory proposed to be annexed. The special election date that is so indicated shall be one of the dates for special elections provided under RCW 29A.04.330 that is sixty or more days after the date the preference is indicated. The county legislative authority shall call the special election at the special election date so indicated by the city. If the boundary review board or the county annexation review board disapproves the annexation proposal, no further action shall be taken thereon, and no proposal for annexation of the same territory, or substantially the same as determined by the board, shall be initiated or considered for twelve months thereafter.

[ 2015 c 53 s 54; 1989 c 351 s 5; 1986 c 234 s 30; 1975 1st ex.s. c 220 s 15; 1971 ex.s. c 251 s 7; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.050.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding, intent—1975 1st ex.s. c 220: See note following RCW 35.02.170.